Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXV Domestic Relations
CHAPTER 406 Uniform Act on Paternity

406.005.
Definitions for KRS 406.011 to 406.180.

As used in KRS

406.011

to

406.180

:

“Genetic markers” means separate identifiable genes or complexes of genes generally isolated as a result of blood typing, at least seven (7) of which are normally tested in a paternity proceeding.

“Genetic tests” means blood or tissue typing tests including, but not limited to, tests of red cell antigens, red cell isoenzymes, human leukocyte antigens, serum proteins, electrofloresis, or deoxyribonucleic acid.

“Paternity index” means the commonly accepted indicator used for denoting the existence of paternity. It represents the mathematically computed probability that the putative father is the true father of the child, as opposed to any other man of similar ethnic background. The paternity index, computed using results of various paternity tests following accepted statistical principles for the computation of probability, shall be in accordance with the method of expression accepted by the American Association of Blood Banks.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 434, § 6, effective July 14, 1992.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Motion for Summary Judgment and Order of Support, Form 255.08.

406.010.
What children considered bastards. [Repealed.]

406.011.
Obligations of father — Presumption of paternity.

The father of a child which is or may be born out of wedlock is liable to the same extent as the father of a child born in wedlock, whether or not the child is born alive, for the reasonable expense of the mother’s pregnancy and confinement and for the education, necessary support and funeral expenses of the child. A child born during lawful wedlock, or within ten (10) months thereafter, is presumed to be the child of the husband and wife. However, a child born out of wedlock includes a child born to a married woman by a man other than her husband where evidence shows that the marital relationship between the husband and wife ceased ten (10) months prior to the birth of the child.

History.

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 37, § 1; 1972, ch. 159, § 1.

406.020.
Charge of bastardy; statement to county clerk. [Repealed.]

406.021.
Determination of paternity — Liability of noncustodial parent.

Paternity may be determined upon the complaint of the mother, putative father, child, person, or agency substantially contributing to the support of the child. The action shall be brought by the county attorney or by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services or its designee upon the request of complainant authorized by this section.

Paternity may be determined by the District Court when the mother and father of the child, either:

Submit affidavits in which the mother states the name and Social Security number of the child’s father and the father admits paternity of the child; or

Give testimony before the District Court in which the mother states the name and Social Security number of the child’s father and the father admits paternity of the child.

If paternity has been determined or has been acknowledged according to the laws of this state, the liabilities of the noncustodial parent may be enforced in the same or other proceedings by the mother, child, person, or agency substantially contributing to the cost of pregnancy, confinement, education, necessary support, or funeral expenses. Bills for testing, pregnancy, and childbirth without requiring third party foundation testimony shall be regarded as prima facie evidence of the amount incurred. An action to enforce the liabilities of the noncustodial parent shall be brought by the county attorney upon the request of such complainant authorized by this section. An action to enforce the liabilities of the cost of pregnancy, birthing costs, child support, and medical support shall be brought by the county attorney or by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services or its designee.

Voluntary acknowledgment of paternity pursuant to KRS

213.046

shall create a rebuttable presumption of paternity.

Upon a showing of service of process on the defendant and if the defendant has made no pleading to the court or has not moved to enter evidence pursuant to KRS

406.091

, the court shall order paternity to be established by default.

History.

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 37, § 2; 1968, ch. 200, § 11; 1972, ch. 159, § 2; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 410, effective January 2, 1978; 1990, ch. 272, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 330, § 17, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 255, § 26, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 426, § 587, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 636, effective June 20, 2005; 2005, ch. 149, § 2, effective June 20, 2005.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(6/20/2005). This section was amended by 2005 Ky. Acts chs. 99 and 149, which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

406.025.
Rebuttable presumption of voluntary acknowledgment-of-paternity affidavit — Temporary support order if paternity is indicated — Continuation of child support until final determination of paternity.

Upon completion of a signed, notarized, voluntary acknowledgment-of-paternity affidavit by the mother and alleged father, obtained through the hospital-based paternity program, and submitted to the state registrar of vital statistics, paternity shall be rebuttably presumed for the earlier of sixty (60) days or the date of an administrative or judicial proceeding relating to the child, including a proceeding to establish a child support order.

Upon completion of a signed, notarized, voluntary acknowledgment-of-paternity affidavit by the mother and alleged father obtained outside of the hospital and submitted to the state registrar of vital statistics, paternity shall be rebuttably presumed for the earlier of sixty (60) days or the date of an administrative or judicial proceeding relating to the child, including a proceeding to establish a child support order following the date of signatures on the notarized affidavit.

Pending an administrative or judicial determination of parentage, or upon a signed, notarized, voluntary acknowledgment-of-paternity form having been transmitted by the local registrar and received by the Vital Statistics Branch, a temporary support order shall be issued upon motion of any party if paternity is indicated by genetic testing or other clear and convincing evidence.

The motion shall be accompanied by an affidavit setting forth the factual basis for the motion and the amounts requested.

The court shall, within fourteen (14) days from the filing of the motion, order an amount of temporary child support based upon the child support guidelines as provided by KRS

403.212

or

403.2121

. The ordered child support shall be retroactive to the date of the filing of the motion to move the court to enter an order for temporary child support without written or oral notice to the adverse party. The order shall provide that the order becomes effective seven (7) days following service of the order and movant’s affidavit upon the adverse party unless the adverse party, within the seven (7) day period, files a motion for a hearing before the court. The motion for hearing shall be accompanied by the affidavit required by KRS 403.160(2)(a). Pending the hearing, the adverse party shall pay child support in an amount based upon the guidelines and the adverse party’s affidavit. The child support order entered following the hearing shall be retroactive to the date of the filing of the motion for temporary support unless otherwise ordered by the court.

Unless good cause is shown, court or administratively ordered child support shall continue until final judicial or administrative determination of paternity.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 365, § 12, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 255, § 27, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 637, effective June 20, 2005; 2022 ch. 122, § 9, effective July 14, 2022.

406.030.
Warrant; bond of accused for appearance; continuance. [Repealed.]

406.031.
Limitation of action.

The determination of paternity under the provisions of KRS

406.021

(1) shall be commenced within eighteen (18) years after the birth, miscarriage or stillbirth of a child. However, in such cases, liability for child support shall not predate the initiation of action taken to determine paternity as set forth in KRS

406.021

if the action is taken two (2) years or more from the date of birth.

Any person for whom paternity has not yet been established and who had not reached eighteen (18) years of age as of August 16, 1984, including those persons for whom a paternity action was brought but dismissed because a statute of limitations of less than eighteen (18) years was then in effect, may bring an action to establish paternity.

History.

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 37, § 3; 1972, ch. 159, § 3; 1984, ch. 379, § 6, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 487, § 17, effective July 15, 1986; 1990, ch. 418, § 15, effective July 13, 1990; 2021 ch. 47, § 4, effective June 29, 2021.

406.035.
Written order of paternity — Limit on public inspection — Persons who may inspect.

If paternity has been determined under the provisions of subsection (1) or (2) of KRS

406.021

, the court shall make a written order of paternity.

Information concerning this action received or transmitted shall not be published or be open for public inspection, including where the cabinet determines reasonable evidence of domestic violence or child abuse, if the disclosure of the information could be harmful to the custodial parent or the child of the parent.

Such orders are to be kept separately and shall not be open for public inspection except that they may be inspected by employees of governmental agencies in the performance of their duties, all law enforcement agencies including county attorneys, Commonwealth’s attorneys, District and Circuit Judges, and anyone else under order of the court expressly permitting inspection. Either party to an action under this chapter or attorneys of a party to an action under this chapter shall be permitted to inspect the order entered in the action to which he is a party.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 159, § 4; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 411, effective January 2, 1978; 1984, ch. 111, § 162, effective July 13, 1984; 1998, ch. 255, § 28, effective July 15, 1998.

Opinions of Attorney General.

It is up to the court and the court clerk to adhere to the policy of confidentiality.

OAG 78-104

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Comments, Access to Public Documents in Kentucky, 64 Ky. L.J. 165 (1975-76).

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, Prac. & Proc., 5th Ed., Practice Context for Paternity, § 255.00.

406.040.
Procedure if accused fails to give or renew bond. [Repealed.]

406.041.
Effect of death of father on liabilities.

The obligation of the estate of the father for liabilities under this chapter shall not be terminated by the death of the father obligated to support the child. If a father obligated to support the child dies, the amount of support may be modified, revoked, or commuted to a lump-sum payment, to the extent just and appropriate in the circumstances.

History.

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 37, § 4; 1992, ch. 434, § 7, effective July 14, 1992.

406.050.
Forfeiture of bond on failure to appear. [Repealed.]

406.051.
Remedies — District Court’s concurrent jurisdiction for child custody and visitation in paternity cases.

The District Court has jurisdiction of an action brought under this chapter and all remedies for the enforcement of judgments for expenses of pregnancy and confinement for a wife or for education, necessary support, or funeral expenses for children born out of wedlock. An appeal may be had to the Circuit Court if prosecuted within sixty (60) days from the date of judgment. The court has continuing jurisdiction to modify or revoke a judgment for future education. All remedies under the uniform reciprocal enforcement of support act are available for enforcement of duties of support under this chapter.

The District Court may exercise jurisdiction, concurrent with that of the Circuit Court, to determine matters of child custody and visitation in cases where paternity is established as set forth in this chapter. The District Court, in making these determinations, shall utilize the provisions of KRS Chapter 403 relating to child custody and visitation. The District Court may decline jurisdiction if it finds the circumstances of any case require a level of proceedings more appropriate to the Circuit Court.

History.

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 37, § 5; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 412, effective January 2, 1978; 1984, ch. 16, § 9, effective July 13, 1984; 1996, ch. 314, § 1, effective July 15, 1996.

406.060.
Procedure in absence of accused. [Repealed.]

406.061.
Jury trial in paternity action.

To the extent necessary to conform to federal law, 42

U.S.C. sec. 666(a)(5)

(l), except to the extent that it is required under Section 7 of the Constitution of Kentucky, no party shall be entitled to a trial by a jury in a paternity action.

History.

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 37, § 6; 1998, ch. 255, § 29, effective July 15, 1998.

Opinions of Attorney General.

If either party who has entered an appearance in a paternity suit demands a trial by jury on the issues presented, a jury must be empaneled; otherwise, in the absence of a demand by either party, the court may either determine the issues without a jury or empanel a jury on its own motion in its discretion.

OAG 66-762

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, Prac. & Proc. 5th Ed., Practice Context for Paternity, § 255.00.

Petrilli, Kentucky Family Law, Illegitimacy and Paternity Proceedings, §§ 31.15, 31.22, 31.24.

Petrilli, Kentucky Family Law, Forms, Paternity, Form 7.3.

406.070.
Who may testify; effect of child’s birth in another state. [Repealed.]

406.071.
Time of trial.

If the issue of paternity is raised in an action commenced during the pregnancy of the mother, the trial shall not, without the consent of the alleged father, be held until after the birth or miscarriage but during such delay testimony may be perpetuated in accordance with the Rules of Civil Procedure.

History.

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 37, § 7.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Petrilli, Kentucky Family Law, Illegitimacy and Paternity Proceedings, § 31.15.

406.080.
Discharge of accused; procedure on motion for new trial. [Repealed.]

406.081.
Authority for genetic tests — Failure of alleged father to submit to tests.

The court, upon request of a party or on its own motion, shall order the mother, child, and alleged father to submit to genetic tests. If the mother refuses for herself or on behalf of the child to submit to the tests, the court may resolve the question of paternity against her unless the action is brought by or is being prosecuted by an agency contributing to the support of the child. If the alleged father is ordered to submit to genetic tests and refuses or does not submit the results of the paternity test to the court within thirty (30) days of the court order, the court shall resolve the question of paternity against him.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 37, § 8; 1984, ch. 379, § 4, effective July 13, 1984; 1992, ch. 434, § 8, effective July 14, 1992; 2018 ch. 159, § 32, effective July 14, 2018.

406.090.
Judgment; order for custody, support and education of child. [Repealed.]

406.091.
Ratification of unchallenged acknowledgment of paternity — Genetic tests to include tests for inherited characteristics — Appointment of examiner of genetic markers — Genetic testing in contested paternity case — Admissibility of test results — Additional tests — Costs.

An unchallenged acknowledgment of paternity shall be ratified under KRS Chapter 213 without the requirement for judicial or administrative proceedings. If a genetic test is required, the court shall direct that inherited characteristics be determined by appropriate testing procedures, and shall appoint an expert qualified as an examiner of genetic markers to analyze and interpret results and to report to the court.

In a contested paternity case, the child and all other parties shall submit to genetic testing upon a request of any such party which shall be supported by a sworn statement of the party, except for good cause.

Genetic test results are admissible and shall be weighed along with other evidence of the alleged father’s paternity.

Any objection to genetic testing results shall be made in writing to the court within twenty (20) days of receipt of genetic test results. If the results of genetic tests or the expert’s analysis of inherited characteristics is disputed, the court, upon reasonable request of a party, shall order that an additional test be made by the same laboratory or independent laboratory at the expense of the party requesting additional testing. If no objection is made, the test results are admissible as evidence of paternity without the need for foundation testimony or other proof of authenticity or accuracy.

Verified documentation of the chain of custody in transmitting the blood specimens is competent evidence to establish the chain of custody.

A verified expert’s report shall be admitted at trial unless the expert is called by a party or the court as a witness to testify to his findings.

Except where the Cabinet for Health and Family Services administratively orders genetic testing, all costs associated with genetic testing shall be paid by the party who requested that the action be brought pursuant to KRS

406.021

.

When administratively ordered, the cabinet shall pay the cost of genetic testing to establish paternity, subject to recoupment from the alleged father when paternity is established. The cabinet shall obtain additional testing in any case if an original test is contested, upon request and advance payment by the contestant.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 37, § 9; 1984, ch. 379, § 5, effective July 13, 1984; 1992, ch. 434, § 9, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 330, § 18, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 255, § 30, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 638, effective June 20, 2005; 2018 ch. 159, § 33, effective July 14, 2018.

406.100.
Bond of person convicted; procedure upon failure to make bond. [Repealed.]

406.101.
Compensation of expert witnesses.

The compensation of each expert witness appointed by the court shall be fixed at a reasonable amount. It shall be paid as the court shall order. The court may order that it be paid by the parties in such proportions and at such times as it shall prescribe. The fee of an expert witness called by a party but not appointed by the court shall be paid by the party calling him but shall not be taxed as costs in the action.

History.

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 37, § 10.

Opinions of Attorney General.

If both parties in a paternity suit are paupers and have been authorized to proceed as such, the court may in its discretion direct that the county shall pay the deposition expenses if depositions are ordered and the compensation of expert witnesses appointed by the court.

OAG 65-391

.

If the parties in a paternity suit, or either of them, are not paupers qualified under KRS

453.190

, the compensation of the expert witness or witnesses shall be paid as the court orders.

OAG 65-391

.

The commonwealth is not liable for the costs and expenses incurred in a paternity suit regardless of the decision reached on the paternity question.

OAG 65-391

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Petrilli, Kentucky Family Law, Illegitimacy and Paternity Proceedings, § 31.30.

406.110.
Enforcement of bond; effect of child’s death. [Repealed.]

406.111.
Effect of test results — Rebuttable presumption.

If the court finds that the conclusions of all the experts, as disclosed by the evidence based upon the tests, are that the alleged father is not the father of the child, the question of paternity shall be resolved accordingly. If the court finds that the statistical probability of paternity equals or exceeds ninety-nine percent (99%), as calculated by the experts qualified as examiners of genetic markers, and that the paternity index, as calculated by the experts qualified as examiners of genetic markers, is one hundred (100) to one (1) or greater, there is a rebuttable presumption, affecting the burden of proof, of paternity. This presumption shall only be rebutted by a preponderance of the evidence. If the presumption is not rebutted, the court may enter a summary judgment of paternity, pursuant to Rule 56 of the Rules of Civil Procedure.

History.

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 37, § 11; 1992, ch. 434, § 10, effective July 14, 1992.

406.115.
Costs of action and attorney’s fees.

The court from time to time, after considering the financial resources of both parties, may order a party to pay a reasonable amount for the cost to the other party of maintaining or defending any proceeding under this chapter and for attorney’s fees for private counsel, including sums for legal services rendered and costs incurred prior to commencement of the proceeding, or after entry of judgment. Upon determination that an action under this chapter was initiated in bad faith, the court may order the offending party to pay attorney’s fees to the opposing attorney for legal services rendered and costs incurred. The court may order that the amount be paid directly to the attorney, who may enforce the order in his or her name.

HISTORY:

2021 ch. 140, § 1, effective June 29, 2021.

406.120.
Person convicted to pay costs; fee of county attorney. [Repealed.]

406.121.
Judgment, how enforced.

Judgments under this chapter may be for periodic payments which may vary in amount. The court may order payments to be made to the mother or to some person, corporation, or agency designated to administer them under the supervision of the court. Willful failure of the alleged father to perform the judgment of the court may be punished as a contempt of the court. The court may impose a punishment of not more than thirty (30) days imprisonment in the county jail without the intervention of a jury. This provision shall not be deemed to limit or abrogate any other remedies which exist for the enforcement of judgments.

History.

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 37, § 12.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Even after a default judgment has been entered, the usual provisions for an enforcement of the judgment by contempt proceedings and the requirement of a performance bond are available, but, before contempt proceedings may be had against a defendant, he must have notice of the judgment.

OAG 66-762

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Petrilli, Kentucky Family Law, Illegitimacy and Paternity Proceedings, §§ 31.25, 31.26.

Petrilli, Kentucky Family Law, Forms, Paternity, Form 7.4.

406.130.
Appeal; liability of sureties on supersedeas bond. [Repealed.]

406.131.
Bond to secure payment of judgment.

The court at any time may require the alleged father to give bond or other security for the payment of the judgment. If the court requires that bond be given and if the alleged father is unwilling or unable to procure same, the alleged father may be confined to the county jail until same is procured provided, however, that after the alleged father has remained in jail for a period of thirty (30) days he shall be released provided he make oath in writing before the committing judge that he is unable to obtain the execution of the bond.

History.

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 37, § 13.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Even after a default judgment has been entered, the usual provisions for an enforcement of the judgment by contempt proceedings and the requirement of a performance bond are available, but, before contempt proceedings may be had against a defendant, he must have notice of the judgment.

OAG 66-762

.

Where a woman obtained a paternity judgment, her basic remedial rights under former law (KRS

406.100

, repealed in 1964), providing for bond of person convicted, were not abrogated and such remedies can now be utilized except that this section should be used instead of the former section.

OAG 69-390

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Petrilli, Kentucky Family Law, Illegitimacy and Paternity Proceedings, §§ 31.9, 31.25, 31.26.

Petrilli, Kentucky Family Law, Forms, Paternity, Form 7.4.

406.140.
Form of bonds. [Repealed.]

406.141.
Settlement agreements.

An agreement of settlement with the alleged father is binding only when approved by the court.

History.

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 37, § 14.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The court may approve of a settlement under the statute, within its discretion, even though the putative father may deny paternity and even though the case has not proceeded to a finding or judgment of paternity.

OAG 67-116

.

Where the petitioner-mother in a paternity action is receiving Aid to Families with Dependent Children from the commonwealth of Kentucky, and the action is brought by the commonwealth on behalf of the mother against the alleged father in order to establish legal paternity for the present and future protection and benefit of the minor child, the mother may enter into an agreement with the alleged father providing for his support of the child under the following conditions: (1) The agreement must be approved by the Cabinet for Human Resources, through its representative, the county attorney. (2) The agreement must be one that is deemed to be in the best interest of the child. (3) The agreement must be one deemed to serve the best interests of the taxpayers, federal and Kentucky. (4) The agreement must be reasonable and conscionable. (5) The agreement must be approved by the district court of jurisdiction, if it is to be valid.

OAG 83-181

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Petrilli, Kentucky Family Law, Forms, Paternity, Form 7.5.

406.150.
Defect in bond. [Repealed.]

406.151.
Venue.

An action under this chapter may be brought in the county where the alleged father is present or has property or in the county where the mother resides.

History.

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 37, § 15.

406.160.
Interpreter for mother of child. [Repealed.]

406.161.
Uniformity of interpretation.

This chapter shall be so interpreted and construed as to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law of those states which enact it.

History.

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 37, § 16.

406.170.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the Uniform Act on Paternity.

History.

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 37, § 17.

406.180.
Applicability.

This chapter applies to all cases of birth out of wedlock:

Where birth occurs within this state;

When birth occurs out of this state at the time the mother is a resident of this state after June 18, 1964; or

When birth occurs out of this state and at some time following the birth the mother becomes a resident of this state after June 18, 1964.

History.

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 37, § 18; 1970, ch. 210, § 1; 1972, ch. 159, § 5.